Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB932.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 448(a), (b), (c), (d)(5) and (j) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 448. Monthly Shipment of Malt or Brewed Beverages.--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (a) The [out-of-State] shipment of malt or brewed beverages to residents of this Commonwealth shall be governed by this section.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or law, a person licensed by this Commonwealth, another state or country as a manufacturer, importer, wholesaler or retailer of malt or brewed beverages and who obtains a malt or brewed beverage shipper license as provided for in this section may ship up to [one hundred ninety-two] seven hundred sixty-eight ounces in a month of any malt or brewed beverage on the order of any resident of this Commonwealth who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age for the resident's personal use and not for resale. [No more than ninety-six ounces of a specific registered or unregistered brand of malt or brewed beverages may be shipped to any one (1) resident during a calendar year.](c) Prior to issuing a direct malt or brewed beverage shipper license, the board shall require an applicant to:(1) File an application with the board.(2) Pay a registration fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(3) [Provide] Unless the applicant holds a license issued by the board, provide to the board a true copy of the applicant's current alcoholic beverage license issued by another state or country.(4) Provide documentation which evidences that the applicant has obtained a sales tax license from the Department of Revenue.(5) Provide the board with any other information that the board deems necessary and appropriate.(d) A direct malt or brewed beverage shipper shall do all of the following:20250HB0932PN0998 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(5) Ensure that all boxes or exterior containers of malt or brewed beverages shipped directly to a resident of this Commonwealth are conspicuously labeled with the words "CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY." Use of a licensed transporter-for-hire is required for delivery.* * *(j) Except for a shipment expressly authorized under subsection (b), nothing under this section may be construed as altering any existing or future distributing rights agreement between a manufacturer and an importing distributor or distributor or any of their rights under law.(k) For purposes of this section, the terms "shipments" or "shipped" are defined as the delivery of or the act of delivering malt or brewed beverages to a resident by the holder of a transporter-for-hire license.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0932PN0998 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718